Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
Article 1 General Provisions
32-3-14.
[Effective July 1, 2023. See note.] Filing notice of appeal.

If the owner, or any of the owners, or any person having a claim against or interest in the property is dissatisfied with the amount of compensation as estimated in the declaration of taking and deposited in court, as provided for in Code Section 32-3-7, such person or persons, or any of them, shall have the right, at any time subsequent to the filing of the declaration and the deposit of the fund into court, but not later than 30 days following the date of the service as provided for in Code Sections 32-3-8 and 32-3-9, to file with the court a petition for review, the same to be in writing and made a part of the record in the proceedings.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-610, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2022, p. 767, § 2-18/HB 916.

Delayed effective date.

Code Section 32-3-14 is set out twice in this Code. This version, as set out above, is effective July 1, 2023. For version effective until July 1, 2023, see the preceding version.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2023, substituted “petition for review” for “notice of appeal” near the end of this Code section. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2022, p. 767, § 3-1/HB 916, not codified by the General Assembly, makes this Code section applicable to petitions for review filed in superior or state court on or after July 1, 2023.

32-3-15.
Interlocutory hearing on amount of compensation.

An appeal having been filed as provided in Code Section 32-3-14, the appellant or appellants, at any time before the beginning of the trial of the issue formed on such appeal, but not later than 90 days after the date of service as provided in Code Sections 32-3-8 and 32-3-9, may file in the case a petition for an interlocutory hearing on the issue of whether the amount deposited in court as just and adequate compensation is sufficient. Such petition shall be served as may be directed by the court. The petition shall be verified and shall state the amount which is claimed by the petitioner to represent just and adequate compensation, together with a sworn, written statement of the facts upon which the claim is based.

Upon the presentation of the interlocutory petition to the judge of the court in which the case is pending, the court shall make such order as to the appointment of assessors as shall conform most nearly to Article 1 of Chapter 2 of Title 22 and shall give all interested persons equal rights in the selection thereof. If by reason of conflicting interests or otherwise such equality of right cannot be preserved, the judge shall make such order on the subject as shall secure a fair and impartial assessment. The board of assessors so appointed shall determine from all evidence offered by the parties, from personal inspection of the premises, and from its own professional judgment whether the condemnor should be required to deposit any additional amount as estimated compensation and shall, within 30 days of the date of reference to such board, make an interlocutory award based upon such determination.

Upon approval of the interlocutory award by the court and service of a copy upon the condemnor, as may be directed by the court, the condemnor shall within 15 days pay into court any additional amount required to be paid pursuant to the interlocutory award.

Upon the application of the party or parties in interest at any time before a jury verdict on the appeal, the court shall order that the additional money deposited in court be paid forthwith to the parties found to be entitled thereto; provided, however, that any party or parties receiving any payment of any amount paid into court pursuant to an interlocutory award shall, before receiving such payment, file in the case a bond in the amount of such payment conditioned for the repayment of any amount so received by such party which may be in excess of the amount awarded by the jury upon the trial of the appeal. Such bond shall be executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this state; and, in the event the amount awarded by the jury on final trial of the appeal is less than the total amount paid into court by the condemnor, judgment may be entered against the principal and surety on the bond for the amount by which the total amount paid into court exceeds the amount awarded by the jury; and, if the amount awarded by the jury is less than the original deposit, judgment may be entered against the condemnee for that part of the judgment not covered by the bond.

The assessors shall be compensated as provided in Code Section 22-2-84.

The interlocutory award provided for in this Code section shall not be subject to exceptions to any higher court.

If the condemnee notifies the court in writing to dismiss the appeal filed by the condemnee pursuant to Code Section 32-3-14 within 15 days following the date the interlocutory award is approved by the court, that interlocutory award shall become the final judgment in the proceeding and shall not be vacated or modified, and that appeal shall be dismissed unless the condemnor files with the court a notice objecting to such dismissal within 15 days following the date the condemnee notified the condemnor of the notice to dismiss such appeal.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-611, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 332, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1539, § 12.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1991, p. 332, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment shall be applicable to those proceedings in which the declaration of taking is filed with the court on or after July 1, 1991.

Law reviews.

For review of 1998 legislation relating to eminent domain, see 15 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 115 (1998).

32-3-16.
[Effective until July 1, 2023. See note.] Appeal to jury; evidence to be heard on appeal; subsequent review of issues not brought before jury.

After the notice of appeal has been filed as provided in Code Section 32-3-14, it shall be the duty of the court at the next term thereof, which shall convene not earlier than 30 days subsequent to the date of service, as provided for in Code Sections 32-3-8 and 32-3-9, to cause an issue to be made and tried by a jury as to the value of the property or interest taken and the consequential damages to property or interests not taken, with the same right to move for a new trial and file a notice of appeal as in other cases at law, provided that an interlocutory award has not become final pursuant to Code Section 32-3-15.

When an appeal has been filed pursuant to Code Section 32-3-14, all subsequent proceedings thereon shall have the nature of a de novo investigation with the right of either party, under the rules of evidence as provided for in the general laws of this state, to introduce evidence concerning:

The fair market value of the property or interest taken or other evidence of just and adequate compensation;

The prospective and consequential damages to the remaining property or interests by reason of the taking and use of the property or interest for the purposes for which taken; and

The consequential benefits accruing to such remaining property or interests by reason of such taking and use,

provided that such consequential benefits, if any, may be offset against such consequential damages, if any; but, in no event, shall consequential benefits be offset against the value of the property or interest actually taken.

If, for any reason, the issues made by the filing of the notice of appeal provided for in this Code section are not tried by a jury as to the value of the property or interest taken and the consequential damages to the property or interests not taken, at the next term of the court after the filing of such appeal, such fact shall not be cause for dismissal of the appeal and the issues made by such appeal shall be subject to trial at any future term of the court.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-612, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

Delayed effective date.

Code Section 32-3-16 is set out twice in this Code. This version is effective until July 1, 2023. For version effective July 1, 2023, see the following version.

Cross references.

Further provisions regarding evidence to be considered in determining just and adequate compensation, §§

22-2-109

,

22-2-137

.

32-3-16.
[Effective July 1, 2023. See note.] Appeal to jury; evidence to be heard on appeal; subsequent review of issues not brought before jury.

After the petition for review has been filed as provided in Code Section 32-3-14, it shall be the duty of the court at the next term thereof, which shall convene not earlier than 30 days subsequent to the date of service, as provided for in Code Sections 32-3-8 and 32-3-9, to cause an issue to be made and tried by a jury as to the value of the property or interest taken and the consequential damages to property or interests not taken, with the same right to move for a new trial and file a petition for review as in other cases at law, provided that an interlocutory award has not become final pursuant to Code Section 32-3-15.

When an appeal has been filed pursuant to Code Section 32-3-14, all subsequent proceedings thereon shall have the nature of a de novo investigation with the right of either party, under the rules of evidence as provided for in the general laws of this state, to introduce evidence concerning:

The fair market value of the property or interest taken or other evidence of just and adequate compensation;

The prospective and consequential damages to the remaining property or interests by reason of the taking and use of the property or interest for the purposes for which taken; and

The consequential benefits accruing to such remaining property or interests by reason of such taking and use,

provided that such consequential benefits, if any, may be offset against such consequential damages, if any; but, in no event, shall consequential benefits be offset against the value of the property or interest actually taken.

If, for any reason, the issues made by the filing of the petition for review provided for in this Code section are not tried by a jury as to the value of the property or interest taken and the consequential damages to the property or interests not taken, at the next term of the court after the filing of such appeal, such fact shall not be cause for dismissal of the appeal and the issues made by such appeal shall be subject to trial at any future term of the court.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-612, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2022, p. 767, § 2-19/HB 916.

Delayed effective date.

Code Section 32-3-16 is set out twice in this Code. This version, as set out above, is effective July 1, 2023. For version effective until July 1, 2023, see the preceding version.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2023, substituted “petition for review” for “notice of appeal” twice in subsection (a) and once near the beginning of subsection (c). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2022, p. 767, § 3-1/HB 916, not codified by the General Assembly, makes this Code section applicable to petitions for review filed in superior or state court on or after July 1, 2023.

32-3-17.
Right to intervene in proceedings; effect of subsequent proceedings on rights of condemnor.

No provision of this article in reference to any rule or order, or time for responding thereto, shall be held or construed to exclude any person by way of default from making known his rights or claims in the property or interests or in the fund arising therefrom. Any such person claiming an interest or any rights therein may file appropriate pleadings or intervention at any time before verdict and be fully heard thereon. If any person, at any time during the pendency of such proceeding, desires to come in and be heard on any claim to the fund or interest therein, he shall be allowed to do so.

After the filing of the declaration of taking and the payment of the fund into the registry of the court as provided for in Code Section 32-3-7, the petitioner shall not be concerned with or affected by any subsequent proceedings except as to the appeal and interlocutory petition provided for in Code Sections 32-3-14 and 32-3-15 respectively and concerning which the sole issue shall be as to the amount of just and adequate compensation.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-613, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 32.

32-3-17.1.
[Effective until July 1, 2023. See note.] Decisions upon questions of law; power of judge to give necessary orders and directions; jury trial in open court only.

All questions of law arising upon the pleadings or in any other way arising from the cause, subsequent to the filing of the declaration of taking and the deposit of the fund, and subsequent to the filing of notice of appeal, if any, shall be passed on by the presiding judge who may, from time to time, make such orders and give such directions as are necessary to speed the cause, and as may be consistent with justice and due process of law; but no jury trial shall be had except in open court.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-3-17.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 32; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 32.

Delayed effective date.

Code Section 32-3-17.1 is set out twice in this Code. This version is effective until July 1, 2023. For version effective July 1, 2023, see the following version.

32-3-17.1.
[Effective July 1, 2023. See note.] Decisions upon questions of law; power of judge to give necessary orders and directions; jury trial in open court only.

All questions of law arising upon the pleadings or in any other way arising from the cause, subsequent to the filing of the declaration of taking and the deposit of the fund, and subsequent to the filing of a petition for review, if any, shall be passed on by the presiding judge who may, from time to time, make such orders and give such directions as are necessary to speed the cause, and as may be consistent with justice and due process of law; but no jury trial shall be had except in open court.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-3-17.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 32; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 32; Ga. L. 2022, p. 767, § 2-20/HB 916.

Delayed effective date.

Code Section 32-3-17.1 is set out twice in this Code. This version, as set out above, is effective July 1, 2023. For version effective until July 1, 2023, see the preceding version.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2023, substituted “a petition for review” for “notice of appeal” in the middle of this Code section. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2022, p. 767, § 3-1/HB 916, not codified by the General Assembly, makes this Code section applicable to petitions for review filed in superior or state court on or after July 1, 2023.

32-3-18.
Prevention or delay of vesting of title in condemnor.

No appeal in any cause under this article and no bond or undertaking given shall operate to prevent or delay the vesting of title to such lands in the condemnor, subject, however, to the power of the court as provided in Code Section 32-3-20.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-615, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 32.

32-3-19.
Jury verdict; entry of judgment; award; effect on condemnor’s title.

The verdict of the jury shall have respect to the lands described in the declaration of taking as set forth in Code Section 32-3-6, or such interest therein as may be described in said declaration, or to any separate claim against the property or interest therein as may be ordered and may be molded under the direction of the court so as to do complete justice and avoid confusion of interest. The court shall give such direction as to the disposition of the fund as shall be proper according to the rights of the several respondents.

After the verdict of the jury, the court shall, in instances where no motion for new trial or notice of appeal is filed within the time provided for by law or where such verdict has been affirmed by a proper appellate court and the remittitur from such court has been made the judgment of the superior court, enter judgment in favor of the condemnee and against the condemnor in the amount of such verdict, together with the accrued court costs, which judgment shall be immediately credited with the sum of money deposited by the condemnor with the declaration of taking and which shall bear interest as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section; and, upon the failure or refusal of the condemnor immediately to deposit such increase in such sum into the registry of the court, as well as the accrued court costs, it shall be the duty of said clerk to issue execution therefor.

After just and adequate compensation has been ascertained and established by judgment, the judgment shall include, as part of the just and adequate compensation awarded, interest from the date of taking to the date of payment pursuant to final judgment at the rate of 7 percent per annum on the amount awarded by final judgment as the value of the property as of the date of taking; but interest shall not be allowed on so much thereof as shall have been paid into the court and was subject to withdrawal by the condemnee without the requirement of posting a bond as required by Code Section 32-3-15. However, if the condemnee posted the bond and withdrew the additional deposit made after the special master’s award and is later awarded a sum greater than the original deposit but less than the special master’s award, the condemnee shall not be entitled to interest on this additional deposit for the time he had use of the money; but he shall be entitled to receive the percentage of the reasonable cost of the bond that the sum awarded over the original deposit bears to the sum of the special master’s award over the original deposit. If the condemnee is later awarded a sum that exceeds the special master’s award and he has posted bond and withdrawn the additional deposit, he shall not be entitled to interest on this additional deposit for the time he had use of the money but he shall be entitled to the reasonable cost of the bond.

No sum so paid into the court shall be charged with commissions or poundage.

In any event, the case shall be transferred, under the conditions set out in this Code section, to the closed docket. Nothing in this Code section shall be construed as in any way affecting the title acquired by the condemnor by virtue of the declaration of taking as provided for in Code Section 32-3-7.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-616, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

Cross references.

Interest on judgments generally, §

7-4-12

.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on local government law, see 68 Mercer L. Rev. 199 (2016).

For annual survey on real property, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 251 (2017).

32-3-20.
Effect of article on other methods of condemnation.

In cases involving condemnation of private property for public road purposes or any other public transportation purpose, this article shall be supplementary to and cumulative of the methods of procedure for condemnation of private property prescribed in Chapter 2 of Title 22.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-617, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 973, § 6.